hunspell/mhr/mari.aff
FLAG long
SFX Y8 а ынас-влакнас а
SFX Y8 е ынас-влакнас е
SFX Y8 о ынас-влакнас о
SFX Y8 ӧ ынас-влакнас ӧ
SFX Y8 0 наже-влакнаже [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ынаже-влакнаже а
SFX Y8 е ынаже-влакнаже е
SFX Y8 о ынаже-влакнаже о
SFX Y8 ӧ ынаже-влакнаже ӧ
SFX Y8 0 нажак-влакнажак [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ынажак-влакнажак а
SFX Y8 е ынажак-влакнажак е
SFX Y8 о ынажак-влакнажак о
SFX Y8 ӧ ынажак-влакнажак ӧ
SFX Y8 0 нажат-влакнажат [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ынажат-влакнажат а
SFX Y8 е ынажат-влакнажат е
SFX Y8 о ынажат-влакнажат о
SFX Y8 ӧ ынажат-влакнажат ӧ
SFX Y8 0 нажыс-влакнажыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ынажыс-влакнажыс а
SFX Y8 е ынажыс-влакнажыс е
SFX Y8 о ынажыс-влакнажыс о
SFX Y8 ӧ ынажыс-влакнажыс ӧ
SFX Y8 0 да-влакда [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыда-влакда а
SFX Y8 е ыда-влакда е
SFX Y8 о ыда-влакда о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыда-влакда ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дак-влакдак [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдак-влакдак а
SFX Y8 е ыдак-влакдак е
SFX Y8 о ыдак-влакдак о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдак-влакдак ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дат-влакдат [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдат-влакдат а
SFX Y8 е ыдат-влакдат е
SFX Y8 о ыдат-влакдат о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдат-влакдат ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дас-влакдас [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдас-влакдас а
SFX Y8 е ыдас-влакдас е
SFX Y8 о ыдас-влакдас о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдас-влакдас ӧ
SFX Y8 0 даже-влакдаже [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдаже-влакдаже а
SFX Y8 е ыдаже-влакдаже е
SFX Y8 о ыдаже-влакдаже о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдаже-влакдаже ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дажак-влакдажак [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдажак-влакдажак а
SFX Y8 е ыдажак-влакдажак е
SFX Y8 о ыдажак-влакдажак о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдажак-влакдажак ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дажат-влакдажат [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдажат-влакдажат а
SFX Y8 е ыдажат-влакдажат е
SFX Y8 о ыдажат-влакдажат о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдажат-влакдажат ӧ
SFX Y8 0 дажыс-влакдажыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыдажыс-влакдажыс а
SFX Y8 е ыдажыс-влакдажыс е
SFX Y8 о ыдажыс-влакдажыс о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыдажыс-влакдажыс ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ышт-влакышт [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ышт-влакышт а
SFX Y8 е ышт-влакышт е
SFX Y8 о ышт-влакышт о
SFX Y8 ӧ ышт-влакышт ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштак-влакыштак [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштак-влакыштак а
SFX Y8 е ыштак-влакыштак е
SFX Y8 о ыштак-влакыштак о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштак-влакыштак ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштат-влакыштат [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштат-влакыштат а
SFX Y8 е ыштат-влакыштат е
SFX Y8 о ыштат-влакыштат о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштат-влакыштат ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштыс-влакыштыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштыс-влакыштыс а
SFX Y8 е ыштыс-влакыштыс е
SFX Y8 о ыштыс-влакыштыс о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштыс-влакыштыс ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштше-влакыштше [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштше-влакыштше а
SFX Y8 е ыштше-влакыштше е
SFX Y8 о ыштше-влакыштше о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштше-влакыштше ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштшак-влакыштшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштшак-влакыштшак а
SFX Y8 е ыштшак-влакыштшак е
SFX Y8 о ыштшак-влакыштшак о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштшак-влакыштшак ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштшат-влакыштшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштшат-влакыштшат а
SFX Y8 е ыштшат-влакыштшат е
SFX Y8 о ыштшат-влакыштшат о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштшат-влакыштшат ӧ
SFX Y8 0 ыштшыс-влакыштшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX Y8 а ыштшыс-влакыштшыс а
SFX Y8 е ыштшыс-влакыштшыс е
SFX Y8 о ыштшыс-влакыштшыс о
SFX Y8 ӧ ыштшыс-влакыштшыс ӧ

SFX Z1 Y 1 # Descr
SFX Z1 0 0 .
